Louisiana, session 2026, HB1203.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The legislature finds all of the following:
(1) Parent-driven learning microschools operate as voluntary associations of parents
who choose to come together for the purpose of educating their children, and such
associations are protected by parental rights and the freedom of association.
(2) The state has a legitimate interest in ensuring that children have access to
educational opportunities while also respecting the rights of parents to select and participate
in educational environments that best serve their children.
(3) Parent-driven learning microschools are intended solely to provide additional
educational opportunities and support services for parents who choose educational options
for their children that are conducted in nontraditional educational settings.
(4) The purpose of this Act is to protect the freedom of parents to form and
participate in associations that educate their children and ensure that state law does not
unduly restrict parental choice in education.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1203 ENROLLED
(5) Article 101 of the Louisiana Children's Code declares that "(t)he people
of Louisiana recognize the family as the most fundamental unit of human society;
that preserving families is essential to a free society; that the relationship between
parent and child is preeminent in establishing and maintaining the well-being of the
child; that parents have the responsibility for providing the basic necessities of life
as well as love and affection to their children; that parents have the paramount right
to raise their children in accordance with their own values and traditions; that parents
should make the decisions regarding where and with whom the child shall reside, the
educational, moral, ethical, and religious training of the child…"
Section 2. The Chapter heading of Chapter 43-B of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950 and R.S. 17:4036.1(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:236.4 and 407.35(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§236.4. Parent-driven learning microschools
A.(1) If a building has met the occupancy requirements as a home,
commercial establishment, or other classification of occupancy, then the use, rental,
lease, or otherwise lawful possession of the building, whether in whole or in part, by
a parent-driven learning microschool shall not alter or change the zoning or
occupancy classification of the building or subject the building to any additional
building code requirements or fire safety regulations due to the fact that parents are
making use of all or part of the building as a parent-driven learning microschool.
(2) No governmental agency shall take any of the following actions against
a parent who participates in a parent-driven learning microschool or against the
parent-driven learning microschool:
(a) Restrict or deny the use of the building by parents or children, regardless
of age, for the same or similar purposes as provided in R.S. 13:5233.1(A)(4),
regardless of the day of the week, time, or number of hours of the day, or require
compliance with Part X-B of Chapter 1 of this Title or any other provision of this
Title.
(b) Require that a parent-driven learning microschool register or otherwise
report to any governmental agency.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1203 ENROLLED
B. As used in this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Governmental agency" shall have the same meaning as "government"
or "governmental agency" as defined in R.S. 13:5234.
(2) "Parent-driven learning microschool" means a voluntary association of
parents who choose to group their children together, regardless of age, for
educational or instructional activities conducted at mutually agreed-upon times and
days, and which may include compensated or uncompensated parents, tutors, or
instructors, for the purpose of providing a personalized learning experience for each
student, and that meets all of the following requirements:
(a) Students in multiple grade levels participate for part or all of the school
week, regardless of the time of day or regardless of the week or month of the year.
(b) Instruction occurs in a home, community space, library, learning center,
or other nontraditional educational setting.
C.(1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to modify, supersede, or
otherwise affect the laws governing religious educational programs conducted in
churches or other religious institutions as provided in R.S. 13:5233.1.
(2) Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to supersede, limit, or diminish
the rights guaranteed under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States, Article I, Section 8 of the Constitution of Louisiana, or the Preservation of
Religious Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq., all of which shall prevail in the event
of any conflict with any provision of this Section.
* * *
§407.35. Exemptions from licensure requirements
* * *
D. Nothing in this Part shall apply to a parent-driven learning microschool,
as provided in R.S. 17:236.4, or a religious education activity, as provided in R.S.
13:5233.1.
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1203 ENROLLED
CHAPTER 43-B. PUBLIC SCHOOL LEARNING PODS
§4036.1. Learning Public school learning pods
A.(1) Each public school governing authority may establish public school
learning pods as an extension of any school under its jurisdiction.
(2) For purposes of this Chapter, "public school learning pod" means a group
of at least ten students enrolled in the school who receive instruction in a small group
setting.
B. A student shall be assigned to a public school learning pod only if the
assignment is requested by his parent or authorized by his parent upon the
recommendation of school officials.
* * *
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed, pursuant to its
statutory authority, to make any technical changes necessary to change all references in R.S.
17:4036.1 from "learning pods" to "public school learning pods" and to redesignate and
reletter the Subsections in R.S. 17:4036.1in order to conform the terminology and lettering
of the provisions of this Act.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.